Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.772

Subject to appropriation.

The duties in RCW 43.330.760 through 43.330.770 are subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for the specific purpose.

[ 2021 c 64 s 7.]

NOTES:

Short title—2021 c 64: See note following RCW 43.330.760.